Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.060

Costs.

Subject to available funds specifically appropriated for this purpose, whenever a presidential primary is held as provided by this chapter, the state of Washington shall assume all costs of holding the primary if it is held alone. If any other election or elections are held at the same time, the state is liable only for a prorated share of the costs. The county auditor shall determine the costs, including the state's prorated share, if applicable, in the same manner as provided under RCW 29A.04.410 and shall file a certified claim with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this section. Reimbursements for primary costs must be from appropriations specifically provided by law for that purpose.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1406. Prior: 1995 1st sp.s. c 20 s 5; 1989 c 4 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 99). Formerly RCW 29.19.080.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 20: See note following RCW 29A.56.020.